inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_abstract.lexc
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0PlO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@n%>%>sii%>%>naawaa%>an #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@n%>%>sii%>%>naawaa #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@n%>%>sii%>%>naawaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@n%>%>sii%>%>naawaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0PlO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@n%>%>naawaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@n%>%>naawaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0PlO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@n%>%>naawaa%>an #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@n%>%>naawaa #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@n%>%>naawaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@n%>%>naawaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@n%>%>sii%>gwaaban2 #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@n%>%>sii%>goban2 #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@ni%>gwaaban2 #;
@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO:@R.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@ni%>goban2 #;
